Massachusetts, session 194th, S908.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 3 of chapter 176Q of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting at the end
thereof the following new subsection:-
(y) to facilitate a private sector method for the collection of health insurance premium
payments made for a health benefit plan by multiple payers, including the policyholder, one or
more employers of one or more individuals covered by the policy, government programs, and
others by educating employers and insurers about collection services available through a
vendor(s).
of 1